California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) Contrary to the regulations of the director, fail to use, or to detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate.

(d) Knowingly possess, without promptly notifying the director or his representative, any official device or any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official certificate, or any device or label, or any carcass of any animal, including any poultry, or part or product thereof, bearing any counterfeit, simulated, forged, or improperly altered official mark.

(e) Knowingly make any false statement in any shipper’s certificate or other nonofficial or official certificate provided for in the regulations of the director.

(f) Knowingly represent that any article has been inspected and passed, or exempted, under this chapter when, in fact, it has, respectively, not been so inspected and passed, or exempted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18848.

It is unlawful for any person to sell any dressed carcass of any livestock or poultry which is intended for food purposes, or any prepared meat or meat food product or poultry product within the state unless it bears the “inspected and passed” stamp of federal inspection or state inspection applied at the establishment where the animal was slaughtered and at the establishment where the meat or meat food product, or poultry or poultry product was prepared or manufactured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18849.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any carcass of any horse, mule, or other equine, or any part of the carcass, or any meat or meat food product thereof, unless it is plainly and conspicuously marked, labeled, or otherwise identified as required by regulations of the director to indicate the animal from which it was derived, and is in compliance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19200) of this part and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 58.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18850.

It is unlawful for any person to buy, sell, transport, or offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any livestock product or poultry product that is not intended for use as human food, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by the regulations of the director or is naturally inedible by humans, and is in compliance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19200) of this part and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 59.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18851.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting, in intrastate commerce, dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animals, or any parts of the carcasses of any animals that died otherwise than by slaughter to buy, sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, or any products of the animal that died otherwise than by slaughter, unless the transaction or transportation, is made in accordance with any regulations the director may prescribe to assure that the animal, or the part or product thereof, will be prevented from being used for human food purposes, and is in compliance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19200) of this part and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 60.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18852.

It is unlawful for any person to give, pay, or offer, directly or indirectly, to any officer or employee of this state authorized to perform any of the duties prescribed by this chapter or by the regulations of the director, any money or other thing of value, with intent to influence such officer or employee in the discharge of any such duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18853.

It is unlawful for any officer or employee of this state authorized to perform any of the duties prescribed by this chapter to accept any money, gift, or other thing of value from any person, given with intent to influence his official action, or to receive or accept from any person engaged in intrastate commerce in meat food products or poultry products any gift, money, or other thing of value given with any purpose or intent whatsoever.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18854.

It is unlawful for any person to forcibly assault, resist, oppose, impede, intimidate, or interfere with any person while engaged in or on account of the performance of his official duties under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18855.

It is unlawful for any person to neglect or refuse to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry, or to produce documentary evidence, if such evidence is available to him, in obedience to the subpoena or lawful requirement of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18856.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully make, or cause to be made, any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made under this chapter or to willfully make, or cause to be made, any false entry in any account, record, or memorandum kept by any person subject to this chapter or to willfully neglect or fail to make, or to cause to be made, full, true, and correct entries in such accounts, records, or memoranda, of all facts and transactions appertaining to the business of such person. It is unlawful to willfully remove from the jurisdiction of this state, or willfully mutilate, alter, or by any other means falsify any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter or to willfully refuse to submit to the director or to any of his authorized agents, for the purpose of inspection and taking copies, any documentary evidence of any person subject to this chapter, which is in his possession or within his control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18857.

It is unlawful for any person required by this chapter to file any annual or special report to fail so to do within the time fixed by the director for filing the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Products in Violation [18871. - 18874.]

18871.

Since it cannot be determined with certainty, by any present known method of inspection, whether meat, including any poultry meat, is unwholesome unless the organs and other tissues of an animal are inspected when slaughtered, and as meat and meat food products, and poultry products which are derived from uninspected livestock or poultry may be unfit for human food, the director, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall seize and destroy for human food purposes any meat, meat food product, or poultry product that does not bear the “inspected and passed” stamp, brand, mark, or label which is required by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18872.

Whenever any livestock product or poultry product or any product exempted from the definition of a livestock product and from the definition of a poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, is found by any authorized representative of the director upon any premises where it is held for purposes of, during, or after distribution in, intrastate commerce, or is otherwise subject to this chapter and there is reason to believe that any such article is adulterated or misbranded and is capable of use as human food, or that it has not been inspected, in violation of the provisions of this chapter or of the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act or the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or that such article or animal has been or is intended to be, distributed in violation of any such provisions, it may be detained by such representative for a period not to exceed 20 days, pending action under Section 18873 or notification of any federal authorities having jurisdiction over such article or animal, and shall not be moved by any person from the place at which it is located when so detained, until released by such representative. All official marks may be required by such representative to be removed from such article or animal before it is released unless it appears to the satisfaction of the director that the article or animal is eligible to retain such marks.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18873.

Any livestock product or poultry product or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry that is being transported in intrastate commerce, or is otherwise subject to this chapter, or is held for sale in this state after such transportation shall be liable to be proceeded against, seized, and condemned, at any time, in any proper court within the jurisdiction of which such article or animal is found, in any of the following cases:

(a) The product is or has been prepared, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered or received for distribution in violation of this chapter.

(b) The product is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded.

(c) In any other way is in violation of this chapter.

If such article or animal is condemned it shall, after entry of the decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court may direct and if sold the proceeds, less the court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses, shall be paid into the State Treasury, but in no event shall the article or animal be sold contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act, or the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. The court may direct that such article or animal be delivered to the owner upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond upon the condition that the article or animal shall not be sold or otherwise disposed of contrary to the provisions of this chapter, or the laws of the United States, and subject to such supervision by an authorized representative of the director as is deemed necessary to insure compliance with the applicable laws. When a decree of condemnation is entered against the article or animal and it is released under bond, or destroyed, court costs and fees, and storage and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, intervening as claimant of such article or animal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18874.

The provisions of Section 18873 shall in no way derogate from authority for condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this chapter, or other laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Investigations [18901. - 18908.]

18901.

The director may gather and compile information, and investigate the organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and the relation to other persons of any person subject to this chapter engaged in intrastate commerce.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18902.

The director may require, by general or special orders, persons subject to this chapter engaged in intrastate commerce, to file with him, in such form as he may prescribe, annual or special, reports or answers in writing to specific questions, furnishing such information as he may require as to the organization, business, conduct, practices, management, and relation to other persons, of the person filing such reports or answers in writing. Such reports and answers shall be made under oath, or otherwise, as the director may prescribe, and shall be filed with the director within such time as he may prescribe.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18903.

For the purpose of this chapter, the director shall at all reasonable times have access to examine and to copy any documentary evidence of any person being investigated or proceeded against, and may require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of all documentary evidence of any person relating to any matter under investigation. The director may sign subpoenas and may administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18904.

Attendance of witnesses, and the production of documentary evidence, may be required at any designated place of hearing. In case of disobedience to a subpoena the director may invoke the aid of any superior court designated in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18905.

The superior court within the jurisdiction of which such inquiry is carried on may, in case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person, issue an order requiring such person to appear before the director or to produce documentary evidence if so ordered, or to give evidence concerning the matter in question. Failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by such court as a contempt thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18906.

The director may order testimony to be taken by deposition in any proceeding or investigation pending under this chapter at any stage of such proceeding or investigation. Such depositions may be taken before any person designated by the director and having power to administer oaths. Such testimony shall be reduced to writing by the person taking the deposition, or under his direction and shall then be subscribed by the deponent. Any person may be compelled to appear and depose, and to produce documentary evidence in the same manner as witnesses may be compelled to appear and testify and produce documentary evidence before the director as previously provided.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18907.

Witnesses summoned before the director shall be paid the same fees and mileage that are paid witnesses in the superior court of this state, and witnesses whose depositions are taken and the persons taking the same shall be entitled to the same fees as are paid for such services in such courts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18908.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers, schedules of charges, contracts, agreements, or other documentary evidence before the director or in obedience to the subpoena of the director, whether such subpoena be signed or issued by him or his delegate, or in any cause or proceeding, criminal or otherwise, based upon or growing out of any alleged violation of this chapter, on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him or it may tend to incriminate him or it or subject him or it to a penalty or forfeiture. No individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to a penalty or forfeiture for, or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that any individual so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Penalties [18931. - 18935.]

18931.

Upon the issuance of an order of the director pursuant to Section 18725, 18728, 18729, or 18730, the operator of the establishment may seek administrative review before the director by filing his written request therefor within 10 days after issuance of the order. Proceedings for such administrative review, except as provided in this section, shall be in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The decision of the director shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 11523 of the Government Code. Any order of the director issued pursuant to Section 18725, 18728, 18729, or 18730, shall remain in force during such administrative and judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18932.

Any person who is found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations promulgated under this chapter is subject to imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both such imprisonment and fine, but if the violation is committed after a conviction of such person under this section has become final, or the violation is committed with intent to defraud or mislead, the person shall be subject to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 119.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18932.1.

Any person that violates any provision of this chapter, or any regulation that is issued pursuant to it, is liable civilly for a penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each such violation. If the court finds that a violation of this chapter was a serious violation, or that the violation is a second or subsequent violation, the person is civilly liable for a penalty not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each violation. Any money that is received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund, and upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used for the purposes described in Section 221.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 16.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18932.2.

(a) In lieu of any civil action brought pursuant to Section 18932.1 and in lieu of seeking prosecution pursuant to Section 18932, the secretary may levy an administrative penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) upon any person for each violation of this chapter.

(b) Before an administrative penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall be given a written notice of the proposed action, including the nature of the violation and the amount of the proposed penalty, and that person shall have the right to request a hearing. The request shall be made within 20 days after the person receives notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action,
 which shall be sent by certified mail to the last-known address of the person charged, shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or if the notice is not accepted at that address. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to review the secretary’s evidence and to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(c) Any person upon whom an administrative penalty is levied may appeal to the department, within 20 days of the date of receiving notification of the penalty, as follows:

(1) The appeal shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) Any party, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter, may present written evidence and a written argument to the secretary.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are made.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days prior to the date set therefor. This time requirement may be changed upon agreement between the department and the person appealing the penalty.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal based on any oral or written arguments, briefs, and evidence received.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of the appeal, or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments. A copy of the department’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant.

(7) The secretary may sustain the decision, modify the decision by reducing the amount of the penalty levied, or reverse the decision.

(8) A review of the secretary’s decision may be sought by the person against whom the penalty was levied pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) After completion of the review procedure provided in this section, the secretary may file a certified copy of the secretary’s final decision that directs payment of an administrative penalty and, if applicable, any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. No fees shall be charged by the clerk of the superior court for the performance of any official service required
 in connection with the entry of a judgment pursuant to this section.

(e) Any money that is received pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 17.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18933.

Any person who, as principal or agent, employer or employee, adulterates any meat or meat food product or poultry product intended for sale as human food with the product of an animal which has died otherwise than by slaughter or the product of an animal which has not been slaughtered under inspection in accordance with this chapter, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 120.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

18934.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter, the department may bring an action in superior court and such court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown, to grant a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter. Any proceeding under the provisions of this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The department shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss. The court may require such acts or course of conduct as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18935.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report for prosecution or to institute injunction proceedings for any minor violation of this chapter whenever he believes that the public interest will be adquately served by a suitable written notice of warning, and compliance with such notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. California Meat and Poultry Supplemental Inspection Act [18940. - 19040.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and Short Title [18940. - 18949.]

18940.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Meat and Poultry Supplemental Inspection Act and supplements the provisions of the California Meat and Poultry Inspection Act, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18650).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18940.5.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in Article 1 (commencing with Section 18650) of Chapter 4 govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18941.

“Inspector” means an employee of the department authorized to perform inspection functions under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18650) and under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18942.

“Licensed livestock meat inspector” means a person who is licensed by the department to perform inspection functions under this chapter in custom livestock slaughterhouses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18942.2.

“Licensed processing inspector” means a person who is licensed by the department to perform inspection functions under this chapter in licensed meat processing establishments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18943.

“Livestock” means any cattle, sheep, swine, and goat, and pursuant to regulations adopted by the Fish and Game Commission, for the purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18650) and this chapter, fallow deer (Dama dama) whether alive or dead.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18944.

“Livestock product” means any carcass, part of the carcass, meat, or meat food product of any livestock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18945.

“Slaughter” means the stunning, bleeding, eviscerating, skinning, splitting, and preparing of livestock for human consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18946.

“Custom livestock slaughterhouse” means a licensed establishment where:

(a) Cattle, sheep, swine, or goats are slaughtered and prepared for the owners of the livestock.

(b) Fallow deer are slaughtered and prepared for transportation or sale, or transportation and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

18947.

“Meat processing establishment” means a licensed establishment required to be inspected pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18650) where livestock or poultry products are prepared by curing, drying, smoking, or rendering and the products are sold on the premises to household consumers, and a licensed establishment where fallow deer products may be prepared for transportation or sale, or transportation and sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 18.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18947.2.

“Smoking” means exposing meat or poultry products, for the purpose of food preservation, rather than as a method of flavor enhancement, to an environment of smoke generated from hardwood, hardwood sawdust, corn cobs, or natural or artificial liquid smoke that has been transformed into a true gaseous state by application of direct heat.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 19.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

18948.

“Sanitary” means free from dirt, filth, and contamination and free from any other substance or organisms which are known to be injurious to human health or which would render the product adulterated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18949.

“Establishment” means any business, firm, or facility that is required to be licensed by the director under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [18950. - 18955.]

18950.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Sausage products and cured and smoked meat products which are processed and sold at retail meat processing establishments and custom slaughtered carcasses are an important source of the food supply in California; and it is essential and in the public interest that the health and welfare of consumers of these products are protected by ensuring that meat, both slaughtered and processed, is wholesome and not adulterated.

(b) Meat processing establishments and custom slaughter establishments exempt from federal inspection have been required to be inspected in California.

(c) There is a public demand for specialty meat food products and there has been an increase in the number of meat processing establishments manufacturing these products.

(d) Specialty meat food products are sold and displayed in meat markets and are difficult to distinguish from United States Department of Agriculture inspected and passed products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18951.

The Legislature further finds and declares that:

(a) A significant number of persons raise their own animals or purchase their animals alive and then have them slaughtered.

(b) Rather than have their animals slaughtered under unsanitary conditions, those persons would prefer to have their animals slaughtered at sanitary slaughter establishments and have an informed determination made as to the fitness of the carcasses and parts for food.

(c) With the reduction in number of United States Department of Agriculture inspected slaughter plants in California, there has been a substantial increase in small custom slaughter houses to serve that need.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18952.

The objectives of this chapter are to require sanitation and wholesomeness inspection at licensed custom slaughter establishments and licensed meat processing establishments exempt from federal inspection and to provide a cost-effective program using trained and licensed establishment personnel under department supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18955.

No person shall operate an establishment performing any of the functions stated in this chapter unless the establishment is licensed and continues to meet building and sanitation standards required by this chapter and the regulations thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 20.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulations [18960. - 18963.]

18960.

The director may adopt, by regulation, standards and requirements relating to inspection, sanitation, facilities, equipment, reinspection, preparation, processing, buying, selling, transporting, storing, identification, recordkeeping, registration and labeling, and marking for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18961.

The director, by regulation, may adopt provisions of the rules and regulations made under federal acts with such changes therein as he or she deems appropriate to make them applicable to operations and transactions subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18962.

The department may adopt, by regulation, provisions to examine applicants for the positions of licensed livestock meat inspector and licensed processing inspector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18963.

The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Services, shall, on or before December 31, 2001, adopt, by regulations, standards and requirements relating to inspection, sanitation, facilities, equipment, reinspection, preparation, processing, buying, selling, transporting, storing, identification, recordkeeping, registration and labeling, and marking for fallow deer slaughtered and processed under this chapter. The regulations shall provide for the safe and humane handling and transportation of the fallow deer to a state inspected slaughter facility. No custom livestock slaughterhouse or meat processing establishment shall be approved by the department to slaughter or process fallow deer until adoption of these regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 373, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Inspection Granting and Withdrawal [18970. - 18977.]

18970.

(a) Prior to the issuance of a license to an establishment required to be licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010), the establishment shall meet the department’s building and equipment standards.

(b) Building plans and specifications shall be submitted to the director for approval prior to any intended construction or major reconstruction for any establishment licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18971.

The director shall investigate the sanitary conditions of each establishment required to be licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010) and shall withdraw or otherwise refuse to provide inspection services at any establishment where the sanitary conditions are such as to render adulterated or permit adulteration of any livestock product or poultry product which is prepared or handled at such establishment. No such establishment shall be operated without inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18972.

The director may inspect, reinspect, or order the reinspection of any livestock or poultry product which is slaughtered, processed, or stored in an establishment licensed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18973.

(a) Licensed livestock meat inspectors, licensed processing inspectors, and department inspectors are authorized to supervise the operations of licensed establishments, to order the establishments not to operate until required standards are met, and to cease operations when the standards are violated. These persons are also authorized to require withholding from movement, sale, or the delivery of products that may be unfit, because the products were derived from unfit animals or processed in unsanitary conditions and to require denaturing and condemnation of the unfit products.

(b) The department may immediately withdraw or refuse to provide inspection services to any establishment under this chapter that fails to cease operations, hold any retained product, or destroy any condemned product in accordance with the order of a department inspector or licensed livestock meat inspector or licensed processing inspector. It is unlawful to violate any such order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18974.

The director may order any labeling or containers to be withheld from use if he or she determines that the labeling is false or misleading or the containers are of a misleading size or form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

18975.

If an action of a livestock meat inspector, licensed processing inspector, or department inspector in condemning any livestock or poultry product is questioned, appeal by the licensed establishment operator may be made to the immediate supervisor of the inspector and from his or her decision appeal may be made to the Chief of the Meat and Poultry Inspection Branch. The operator shall abide by the decision of the inspector until or unless the decision is modified by the supervisor or the chief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18976.

If slaughtering, carcass preparation, or processing of any meat, meat products, poultry, or poultry products, or training of licensed livestock meat inspectors or licensed processing inspectors is conducted in an establishment licensed under Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010) during hours considered overtime for state employees or on legal holidays, the owner or operator of the establishment, by contract or agreement with the department, shall pay the additional costs for salaries and expenses for persons employed by the department, as determined by the department, to conduct the necessary inspection work or training during the overtime period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 680, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18977.

The director may require a deposit to pay for the overtime charges which he or she shall deposit in the General Fund, and may refuse inspection if the deposit is not made in a timely fashion. The director shall withdraw inspection services at any establishment licensed under Article 8 (commencing with Section 19010) that does not pay the overtime charges 15 days after the mailing of an invoice therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Livestock Meat Inspector and Processing Inspector Licenses—General Provisions [18980. - 18983.]

18980.

(a) The application fee for a livestock meat inspector’s license or a processing inspector’s license is one hundred dollars ($100). If an applicant for a license does not take the examination within one year after the date of the receipt of the application by the secretary, the application expires. Reexamination requires the payment of an additional application fee.

(b) Each license shall expire on the last day of the calendar year for which it is issued. The fee shall not be prorated.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 1.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18981.
